Washington statutes.
RCW 4.40.010

Issues defined—Kinds.

Issues arise upon the pleadings when a fact or conclusion of law is maintained by one party and controverted by the other, they are of two kinds—first, of law; and second, of fact.

[ 1893 c 127 s 28; Code 1881 s 200; 1877 p 42 s 204; 1854 p 163 s 179; RRS s 309.]